src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

a (->) A,
b (->) B,
c (->) C,
d (->) D,
e (->) E,
f (->) F,
g (->) G,
h (->) H,
i (->) I,
j (->) J,
k (->) K,
l (->) L,
m (->) M,
n (->) N,
o (->) O,
p (->) P,
q (->) Q,
r (->) R,
s (->) S,
t (->) T,
u (->) U,
v (->) V,
w (->) W,
x (->) X,
y (->) Y,
z (->) Z,
â (->) Â,
ä (->) Ä,
å (->) Å,
ẹ (->) Ẹ,
õ (->) Õ,
ö (->) Ö,
č (->) Č,
đ (->) Đ,
ŋ (->) Ŋ,
š (->) Š,
ŧ (->) Ŧ,
ǧ (->) Ǧ,
ǥ (->) Ǥ,
ǩ (->) Ǩ,
ǯ (->) Ǯ,
ʒ (->) Ʒ,
à (->) À,
á (->) Á,
ã (->) Ã,
æ (->) Æ,
è (->) È,
é (->) É,
ê (->) Ê,
ë (->) Ë,
ì (->) Ì,
í (->) Í,
î (->) Î,
ï (->) Ï,
ð (->) Ð,
ñ (->) Ñ, 
ñ (->) Ñ,
ò (->) Ò,
ó (->) Ó,
ô (->) Ô,
ø (->) Ø,
ù (->) Ù,
ú (->) Ú,
û (->) Û,
ü (->) Ü,
ý (->) Ý,
ž (->) Ž || .#. _ ;
